Utah statutes.
67-20-2.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Agency" means:

(a)  a department, institution, office, college, university, authority, division, board, bureau, commission, council, or other agency of the state;

(b)  a county, city, town, school district, or special improvement or taxing district; or

(c)  any other political subdivision.

(2)  "Compensatory service worker" means a person who performs a public service with or without compensation for an agency as a condition or part of the person's:

(a)  incarceration;

(b)  plea;

(c)  sentence;

(d)  diversion;

(e)  probation; or

(f)  parole.

(3) (a)  "Volunteer" means a person who donates service without pay or other compensation except expenses actually and reasonably incurred as approved by the supervising agency.

(b)  "Volunteer" does not include:

(i)  a person participating in human subjects research to the extent that the participation is governed by federal law or regulation inconsistent with this chapter; or

(ii)  a compensatory service worker.

(c)  "Volunteer" includes a juror or potential juror appearing in response to a summons for a trial jury or grand jury.

(4)  "Volunteer facilitator" means a business or nonprofit organization that, from individuals who have a relationship with the business or nonprofit organization, such as membership or employment, provides volunteers to an agency or facilitates volunteers volunteering with an agency.

(5)  "Volunteer safety officer" means an individual who:

(a)  provides services as a volunteer under the supervision of an agency; and

(b)  at the time the individual provides the services to the supervising agency described in Subsection (5)(a), the individual is:

(i)  exercising peace officer authority as provided in Section 53-13-102; or

(ii)  if the supervising agency described in Subsection (5)(a) is a fire department:

(A)  on the rolls of the supervising agency as a firefighter;

(B)  not regularly employed as a firefighter by the supervising agency; and

(C)  acting in a capacity that includes the responsibility for the extinguishment of fire.

(6)  "Volunteer search and rescue team member" means an individual who:

(a)  provides services as a volunteer under the supervision of a county sheriff; and

(b)  at the time the individual provides the services to the county sheriff described in Subsection (6)(a), is:

(i)  certified as a member of the county sheriff's search and rescue team; and

(ii)  acting in the capacity of a member of the search and rescue team of the supervising county sheriff.



Amended by Chapter 249, 2013 General Session

